Arkansas, session 2025, HB1721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 110, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-110-106. Prohibition — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Casino licensee" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other entity holding a license issued by
the Arkansas Racing Commission to conduct casino gaming at a casino; and
(2) "Franchise holder" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other entity holding a franchise to
conduct horse racing under this chapter.
(b) A franchise holder or casino licensee is prohibited from:
(1) Accepting wagers on greyhound racing, either live or
simulcast; and
(2) Conducting greyhound racing.

*CRH036*
03/10/2025 9:18:48 AM CRH036

HB1721
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 111, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-111-106. Prohibition — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Casino licensee" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other entity holding a license issued by
the Arkansas Racing Commission to conduct casino gaming at a casino; and
(2) "Franchise holder" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other entity holding a franchise to
conduct greyhound racing under this chapter.
(b) A franchise holder or casino licensee is prohibited from:
(1) Accepting wagers on greyhound racing, either live or
simulcast; and
(2) Conducting greyhound racing.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-111-508(d)(3), concerning the authority
of the Arkansas Racing Commission to adopt rules permitting wagering on live
or televised racing, is amended to read as follows:
(3) In addition to the pari-mutuel or certificate system of
wagering as authorized by this chapter, the commission is authorized and
directed to establish and adopt rules permitting the conduct of pari-mutuel
or certificate system of wagering upon racing, either horse or greyhound,
horse racing shown live or in any other manner approved by the commission by
television or otherwise to or from the premises of the franchise holder.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-113-103(5)(B), concerning the exceptions
from the definition of "electronic games of skill" under the Local Option
Horse Racing and Greyhound Racing Electronic Games of Skill Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(B) “Electronic games of skill” does not include pari-
mutuel wagering on horse racing and greyhound racing governed by the Arkansas
Horse Racing Law, § 23-110-101 et seq., or the Arkansas Greyhound Racing Law,
§ 23-111-101 et seq., whether pari-mutuel wagering on live racing, simulcast
racing, or races conducted in the past and rebroadcast by electronic means;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-113-603(a), concerning pari-mutuel
03/10/2025 9:18:48 AM CRH036

HB1721
wagering on horse racing and greyhound racing under the Local Option Horse
Racing and Greyhound Racing Electronic Games of Skill Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) Pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing and greyhound racing, whether
on live racing, simulcast racing, or races conducted in the past and
rebroadcast by electronic means, shall continue to be governed by the
Arkansas Horse Racing Law, § 23-110-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Greyhound
Racing Law, § 23-111-101 et seq., respectively, and not by this chapter.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-115-103(13)(C)(iii), concerning the
exclusion of pari-mutuel wagering from the definition of "lottery" under the
Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing or
greyhound racing governed by the Arkansas Horse Racing Law, § 23-110-101 et
seq., or the Arkansas Greyhound Racing Law, § 23-111-101 et seq., whether the
pari-mutuel wagering is on live racing, simulcast racing, or races conducted
in the past and rebroadcast by electronic means;

SECTION 7. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act is effective on and after January 1, 2028.
















03/10/2025 9:18:48 AM CRH036